Utah statutes.
7-14-5.   Reciprocal exchange of information authorized.

One or more financial institutions may jointly agree with one or more other financial institutions for the reciprocal exchange of any information authorized to be reported by the provisions of this chapter.  Such reciprocal exchange of information or the acts or refusals to act of one or more recipients because of such information does not constitute a boycott or blacklist, and is not otherwise a basis for liability to any person on the part of any participant in the reciprocal exchange of information authorized by this chapter.

